Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1013
Owners outside of district; petition; notice; hearing.

Notice of the filing of a petition for attachment fixing the time and place of hearing and giving notice thereof shall be in the same manner as prescribed in section 46-1004, and in addition thereto the county clerk shall send by registered or certified mail, to each director of the board of the district named in the petition, a copy of such petition and notice of the time and place the same shall be considered.

Laws 1967, c. 279, § 13, p. 753.